District of Columbia statutes.
4-1210

Repealed

Income considered in determination of eligibility.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-221, § 11, 36 DCR 553
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-19, title I, § 102(c), 38 DCR 4066
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-27, § 3(c), 38 DCR 4205
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 7, 46 DCR 905
1981 Ed., § 3-1010.
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 7 of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
See notes to § 4-1201.